Hawaii statutes.
[§367D‑6] Female adjudicated youth. The
office of youth services shall collaborate with the departments of human
services, health, labor and industrial relations, and education, as well as
with representatives of the private sector, to develop a comprehensive
continuum of care to address the gender-responsive needs of female adjudicated
youth. [L 2006, c 258, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next